California statutes. Education Code
(f) From funds appropriated under subdivision (c), the Superintendent shall provide not more than two million dollars ($2,000,000) to county superintendents of schools to carry out the requirements of this article, allocated in a manner similar to that created to carry out the new duties of those superintendents under the settlement agreement in the case of Williams v. California (Super. Ct. San Francisco, No. CGC–00–312236).

(g) For purposes of making the computations required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, including computation of the state’s minimum funding
 obligation to school districts and community college districts in subsequent fiscal years, the appropriations made pursuant to subdivisions (c) and (e) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202 and “General Fund revenues appropriated for community college districts,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 41202, for the 2012–13 and 2013–14 fiscal years and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIII B,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for that fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 575, Sec. 3.   (SB 1028)   Effective September 26, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4.5. Local Control and Accountability Plans and the Statewide System of Support [52059.5. - 52077.]

52059.5.

(a) A single system for providing support to local educational agencies and schools pursuant to this article and for federal programs pursuant to the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 6301 et seq.) is hereby established.

(b) The purpose of this statewide system of support is to build the capacity of local educational agencies to do all of the following:

(1) Support the continuous improvement of pupil performance within the state priorities as described in Sections 52060 and 52066.

(2) Address the gaps in achievement between pupil subgroups as described in Section 52052.

(3) Improve outreach and collaboration with stakeholders to ensure that goals, actions, and services as described in school district and county office of education local control and accountability plans reflect the needs of pupils and the community, especially for historically underrepresented or low-achieving populations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 32, Sec. 61.   (AB 1808)   Effective June 27, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

52060.

(a) On or before July 1, 2014, the governing board of each school district shall adopt a local control and accountability plan using a template adopted by the state board.

(b) A local control and accountability plan adopted by the governing board of a school district shall be effective for a period of three years, and shall be updated on or before July 1 of each year.

(c) A local control and accountability plan adopted by the governing board of a school district shall include, for the school district and each school within the school district, all of the information specified in the template adopted by the state board pursuant
 to Section 52064.

(d) All of the following are state priorities for purposes of a school district’s local control and accountability plan:

(1) The degree to which the teachers of the school district are appropriately assigned in accordance with Section 44258.9, and fully credentialed in the subject areas, and, for the pupils they are teaching, every pupil in the school district has sufficient access to the standards-aligned instructional materials as determined pursuant to Section 60119, and school facilities are maintained in good repair, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 17002.

(2) Implementation of the academic content and performance standards adopted by the state board, including how the programs and services
 will enable English learners to access the common core academic content standards adopted pursuant to Section 60605.8 and the English language development standards adopted pursuant to former Section 60811.3, as that section read on June 30, 2013, or former Section 60811.4, as that section read on June 30, 2016, for purposes of gaining academic content knowledge and English language proficiency.

(3) (A) Parental involvement and family engagement, including efforts the school district makes to seek parent input in making decisions for the school district and each individual schoolsite, and including how the school district will promote parental participation in programs for unduplicated pupils and individuals with exceptional needs.

(B) Family engagement may
 include, but need not be limited to, efforts by the school district and each individual schoolsite to apply research-based practices, such as welcoming all families into the school community, engaging in effective two-way communication, supporting pupil success, and empowering families to advocate for equity and access. Family engagement may include, but need not be limited to, treating families as partners to inform, influence, and create practices and programs that support pupil success and collaboration with families and the broader community, expand pupil learning opportunities and community services, and promote civic participation.

(4) Pupil achievement, as measured by all of the following, as applicable:

(A) Statewide assessments administered pursuant to Article 4 (commencing
 with Section 60640) of Chapter 5 of Part 33 or any subsequent assessment, as certified by the state board.

(B) The percentage of pupils who have successfully completed courses that satisfy the requirements for entrance to the University of California and the California State University.

(C) The percentage of pupils who have successfully completed courses that satisfy the requirements for career technical education sequences or programs of study that align with state board-approved career technical education standards and frameworks, including, but not limited to, those described in subdivision (a) of Section 52302, subdivision (a) of Section 52372.5, or paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 54692.

(D) The percentage of
 pupils who have successfully completed both types of courses described in subparagraphs (B) and (C).

(E) The percentage of English learner pupils who make progress toward English proficiency as measured by the English Language Proficiency Assessments for California or any subsequent assessment of English proficiency, as certified by the state board.

(F) The English learner reclassification rate.

(G) The percentage of pupils who have passed an advanced placement examination with a score of 3 or higher.

(H) The percentage of pupils who demonstrate college preparedness pursuant to the Early Assessment Program, as described in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 99300) of
 Part 65 of Division 14 of Title 3, or any subsequent assessment of college preparedness.

(5) Pupil engagement, as measured by all of the following, as applicable:

(A) School attendance rates.

(B) Chronic absenteeism rates.

(C) Middle school dropout rates.

(D) High school dropout rates.

(E) High school graduation rates.

(6) School climate, as measured by all of the following, as applicable:

(A) Pupil
 suspension rates.

(B) Pupil expulsion rates.

(C) Other local measures, including surveys of pupils, parents, and teachers on the sense of safety and school connectedness.

(7) The extent to which pupils have access to, and are enrolled in, a broad course of study that includes all of the subject areas described in Section 51210 and subdivisions (a) to (i), inclusive, of Section 51220, as applicable, including the programs and services developed and provided to unduplicated pupils and individuals with exceptional needs, and the programs and services that are provided to benefit these pupils as a result of the funding received pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by Section 42238.03.

(8) Pupil outcomes, if available, in the subject areas described in Section 51210 and subdivisions (a) to (i), inclusive, of Section 51220, as applicable.

(e) For purposes of the descriptions required by subdivision (b) of Section 52064, the governing board of a school district may consider qualitative information, including, but not limited to, findings that result from school quality reviews conducted pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 52052 or any other reviews.

(f) To the extent practicable, data reported in a local control and accountability plan shall be reported in a manner consistent with how information is reported on the California School Dashboard maintained by the department pursuant to Section 52064.5.

(g) The governing board of a school district shall consult with teachers, principals, administrators, other school personnel, local bargaining units of the school district, parents, and pupils in developing a local control and accountability plan.

(h) A school district may identify local priorities, goals in regard to the local priorities, and the method for measuring the school district’s progress toward achieving those goals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 783, Sec. 1.   (AB 1240)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

52061.

On or before July 1, 2015, and each year thereafter, a school district shall update the local control and accountability plan. The annual update shall be developed using a template adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 52064 and shall include all of the information specified in the template.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 426, Sec. 22.   (AB 1840)   Effective September 17, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

52062.

(a) Before the governing board of a school district considers the adoption of a local control and accountability plan or an annual update to the local control and accountability plan, all of the following shall occur:

(1) The superintendent of the school district shall present the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan to the applicable committees pursuant to Section 52063 for review and comment. The superintendent of the school district shall respond, in writing, to comments received from the parent advisory committee.

(2) The superintendent of the school district shall present the local control and accountability plan or annual update to
 the local control and accountability plan to the English learner parent advisory committee established pursuant to Section 52063, if applicable, for review and comment. The superintendent of the school district shall respond, in writing, to comments received from the English learner parent advisory committee.

(3) The superintendent of the school district shall notify members of the public of the opportunity to submit written comments regarding the specific actions and expenditures proposed to be included in the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan, using the most efficient method of notification possible. This paragraph shall not require a school district to produce printed notices or to send notices by mail. The superintendent of the school district shall ensure that all written notifications related to the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control
 and accountability plan are provided consistent with Section 48985.

(4) The superintendent of the school district shall review school plans submitted pursuant to Section 64001 for schools within the school district and ensure that the specific actions included in the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan are consistent with strategies included in the school plans submitted pursuant to Section 64001.

(5) The superintendent of the school district shall consult with its special education local plan area administrator or administrators to determine that specific actions for individuals with exceptional needs are included in the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan, and are consistent with strategies included in the annual assurances support plan for the
 education of individuals with exceptional needs.

(6) (A) The superintendent of the school district shall present a report on the annual update to the local control and accountability plan and the local control funding formula budget overview for parents on or before February 28 of each year as part of a nonconsent item at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing board of the school district.

(B) The report shall include both of the following:

(i) All available midyear outcome data related to metrics identified in the current year’s local control and accountability plan.

(ii) All available midyear expenditure and implementation data on all actions identified in the current year’s local control and accountability plan.

(b) (1) A governing board of a school district shall hold at least one public hearing to solicit the recommendations and comments of members of the public regarding the specific actions and expenditures proposed to be included in the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan. The agenda for the public hearing shall be posted at least 72 hours before the public hearing and shall include the location where the local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local control and accountability plan will be available for public inspection. The public hearing shall be held at the same meeting as the public hearing required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 42127.

(2) A governing board of a school district shall adopt a local control and accountability plan or annual update to the local
 control and accountability plan in a public meeting. This meeting shall be held after, but not on the same day as, the public hearing held pursuant to paragraph (1). This meeting shall be the same meeting as that during which the governing board of the school district adopts a budget pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42127.

(c) A governing board of a school district may adopt revisions to a local control and accountability plan during the period the local control and accountability plan is in effect. A governing board of a school district may only adopt a revision to a local control and accountability plan if it follows the process to adopt a local control and accountability plan pursuant to this section and the revisions are adopted in a public meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 38, Sec. 70.   (SB 153)   Effective June 29, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

52063.

(a) (1) The governing board of a school district shall establish a parent advisory committee to provide advice to the governing board of the school district and the superintendent of the school district regarding the requirements of this article.

(2) A parent advisory committee shall include parents or legal guardians of currently enrolled pupils in the school district to whom one or more of the definitions in Section 42238.01
 apply, and parents or legal guardians of currently enrolled pupils with disabilities in the school district.

(3) A parent advisory committee of a school district serving middle school or high school pupils shall include at least two pupils as full members. The pupils shall serve for a renewable term of one full school year.

(4) This subdivision shall not require the governing board of a school district serving middle school or high school pupils to include two pupil members on the parent advisory committee if the governing board of the school district establishes or has already established a student advisory committee pursuant to subdivision (b).

(5) This subdivision shall not require the
 governing board of the school district to establish a new parent advisory committee if the governing board of the school district already has established a parent advisory committee that meets the requirements of this subdivision, including any committee established to meet the requirements of the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act, as amended by the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (Public Law 114-95), pursuant to Section 1116 of Subpart 1 of Part A of Title I of that act.

(b) (1) The governing board of a school district serving middle school or high school pupils shall establish a student advisory committee to provide advice to the governing board of the school district and the superintendent of the school district regarding the requirements of this article.

(2) This subdivision shall not require the governing board of a school district serving middle school or high school pupils to establish a new student advisory committee if the governing board of the school district already has established a student advisory committee that meets the requirements of this subdivision, or has two established pupil positions on the parent advisory committee pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) (1) The governing board of a school district shall establish an English learner parent advisory committee if the enrollment of the school district includes at least 15 percent English learners and the school district enrolls at least 50 pupils who are English learners.

(2) This subdivision shall not require the governing board of the
 school district to establish a new English learner parent advisory committee if the governing board of the school district already has established a committee that meets the requirements of this subdivision.

(d) A school district shall take into consideration that the pupil members of a parent advisory committee or student advisory committee represent the diversity of the school district’s pupils, including geographical, socioeconomic, cultural, physical, and educational diversity. Particular effort should be made to reach out to at-risk or disadvantaged pupils to serve as members of a parent advisory committee or student advisory committee, as their participation will provide keen insight into many of the issues that pupils face in their day-to-day lives.

(e) This section shall
 become operative on July 1, 2024.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 922, Sec. 3.   (SB 997)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative July 1, 2024, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

52064.

(a) On or before March 31, 2014, the state board shall adopt a template for a local control and accountability plan and an annual update to the local control and accountability plan for the following purposes:

(1) For use by school districts to meet the requirements of Sections 52060 to 52063, inclusive.

(2) For use by county superintendents of schools to meet the requirements of Sections 52066 to 52069, inclusive.

(3) For use by charter schools to meet the requirements of Section 47606.5.

(b) On or before January 31, 2022, the template adopted by the state board shall
 require the inclusion of all of the following information:

(1) A description of the annual goals, for all pupils and each subgroup of pupils identified pursuant to Section 52052, to be achieved for each of the state priorities identified in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (c) of Section 47605, subparagraph (A) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 47605.6, subdivision (d) of Section 52060, or subdivision (d) of Section 52066, as applicable, and for any additional local priorities identified by the governing board of the school district, the county board of education, or in the charter school petition. For purposes of this article, a subgroup of pupils identified pursuant to Section 52052 shall be a numerically significant pupil subgroup as specified in subdivision (a) of Section 52052.

(2) A description of the specific actions that the school district,
 county office of education, or charter school will take during each year of the local control and accountability plan to achieve the goals identified in paragraph (1), including actions to implement work related to technical assistance pursuant to Section 47607.3, 52071, 52071.5, 52072, or 52072.5. The specific actions shall not supersede the provisions of existing local collective bargaining agreements, if any, within the jurisdiction of the school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(3) One or more summary tables listing and describing the budgeted expenditures for the ensuing fiscal year implementing each specific action included in the local control and accountability plan, including expenditures and specific actions for the ensuing fiscal year that will serve unduplicated pupils, as defined in Section 42238.02, including long-term English learners, and pupils redesignated as fluent English proficient. The summary table
 or tables shall include both of the following:

(A) The total overall expenditures for all specific actions included in the local control and accountability plan, broken down by personnel and nonpersonnel expenditures.

(B) The subtotals of expenditures for each specific action included in the local control and accountability plan broken down into the following categories:

(i) Funds apportioned under the local control funding formula pursuant to Section 42238.02.

(ii) All other state funds.

(iii) All local funds.

(iv) All federal funds.

(4) One or more summary
 tables listing and describing all of the specific actions and budgeted expenditures in paragraph (3) that contribute to the demonstration that the school district, county office of education, or charter school will increase or improve services for unduplicated pupils in proportion to the increase in funds apportioned on the basis of the number and concentration of unduplicated pupils, consistent with regulations adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 42238.07, grouped as follows:

(A) Specific actions and budgeted expenditures provided to all pupils on a districtwide, countywide, or charterwide basis.

(B) Specific actions and budgeted expenditures that are targeted only to one or more unduplicated pupil subgroups. For these specific actions, the description shall specify the unduplicated pupil subgroup or subgroups that are targeted by each specific action and, if not
 provided at all schools, the school or schools where the specific action is provided.

(C) Only for school districts and county offices of education that operate more than one schoolsite, specific actions and budgeted expenditures provided to all pupils on a schoolwide basis, but only at schools serving certain grade spans or only at one or more schools. For these specific actions, the description shall specify the school or schools at which the specific action is provided.

(5) An estimate of the funds to be apportioned in the ensuing fiscal year on the basis of the number and concentration of unduplicated pupils and calculation of the percent the school district, county office of education, or charter school will increase or improve services for unduplicated pupils in proportion to the increase in funds apportioned on the basis of the number and concentration of unduplicated
 pupils, consistent with regulations adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 42238.07.

(6) (A) A demonstration that the school district, county office of education, or charter school will increase or improve services for unduplicated pupils in the ensuing fiscal year in proportion to the increase in funds apportioned on the basis of the number and concentration of unduplicated pupils, consistent with regulations adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 42238.07.

(B) As part of the demonstration required by subparagraph (A), the summary tables required by paragraph (4) shall demonstrate both of the following:

(i) That the full proportionality obligation referenced in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.07 is being met annually through the listed actions and services.

(ii) Each action’s quantitative contribution toward the proportionality obligation as expenditures or its qualitative contribution as a percentage of increased or improved services for unduplicated pupils over and above the level of services provided to all pupils, consistent with the regulations adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 42238.07.

(7) A review of the progress toward the goals included in the existing local control and accountability plan, a review of any changes in the applicability of the goals, an assessment of the effectiveness, or lack thereof, of the specific actions described in the existing local control and accountability plan toward achieving the goals, a description of changes to the specific actions and related expenditures or quality improvements the school district, county office of education, or charter school will make as a result of the review
 and assessment, and an update on progress implementing the specific actions in the current fiscal year, including estimated actual expenditures for the specific actions and actual quality improvements.

(8) (A) The calculations required by paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 42238.07.

(B) If applicable to the school district, county office of education, or charter school pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 42238.07, a description of the specific actions and related expenditures to be implemented using the funds specified in that paragraph, including a demonstration that the planned uses of those funds satisfy the requirements for specific actions to be considered as contributing toward meeting the increased or improved services requirement pursuant to regulations adopted by the state board pursuant to Section 42238.07.

(9) A plan summary that includes general information about the school district, county office of education, or charter school and highlights of the local control and accountability plan and annual update to the local control and accountability plan, including reflections on annual performance on the California School Dashboard authorized in Section 52064.5 and other local data and, as applicable, a summary of the work underway as part of technical assistance pursuant to Section 47607.3, 52071, 52071.5, 52072, or 52072.5.

(10) A summary of the stakeholder engagement process, including stakeholders at schools generating funding pursuant to Section 42238.024, and how stakeholder engagement influenced the development of the adopted local control and accountability plan and annual update to the local control and accountability plan.

(11) For local educational agencies that receive concentration grant funding pursuant to Section 42238.02, a demonstration that the additional funding received as a result of the increased concentration grant add-on percent specified in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section 42238.02 will be used to increase the number of credentialed staff, classified staff, or both of those, that provide direct services to pupils, including custodial staff, on school campuses with greater than 55-percent unduplicated pupil enrollment in the prior year as compared to the staff-to-pupil ratios at schools within the local educational agency with an unduplicated pupil enrollment in the prior year of 55 percent or less, if any.

(c) If possible, the templates identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) for use by county superintendents of schools shall allow a county superintendent of schools to develop a single local control
 and accountability plan that would also satisfy the requirements of Section 48926.

(d) (1) The template for the local control and accountability plan and annual update to the local control and accountability plan shall, to the greatest extent practicable, use language that is understandable and accessible to parents. The state board shall include instructions for school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools to complete the local control and accountability plan and annual update to the local control and accountability plan consistent with the requirements of this section. The state board may include more technical language in the instructions.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (3), the state board shall not require school districts, county offices of education, or charter schools to provide any information in addition to the information
 required pursuant to subdivision (b).

(3) The state board may require the inclusion of additional information in the template in order to meet requirements of federal law, including meeting the requirements of Section 300.600 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(e) (1) The process of developing and annually updating the local control and accountability plan shall support school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools in comprehensive strategic planning, accountability, and improvement across the state priorities, particularly to address and reduce disparities in opportunities and outcomes between pupil groups indicated by the California School Dashboard, and any locally identified priorities through meaningful engagement with local stakeholders.

(2) In developing
 the template for the local control and accountability plan and annual update to the local control and accountability plan, the state board shall ensure that school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools track and report their progress annually on all state priorities, including the applicable metrics specified within each state priority and, for charter schools, in accordance with Section 47606.5.

(3) For each action and budgeted expenditure provided to all pupils on a districtwide, countywide, or charterwide basis pursuant to Section 42238.07, one or more specific metrics to monitor the intended outcome of that action and budgeted expenditure shall be identified.

(4) The instructions developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) shall specify that school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools should prioritize
 the focus of the goals, specific actions, and related expenditures included within the local control and accountability plan and annual update to the local control and accountability plan within one or more state priorities. The instructions shall further specify that school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools shall consider their performance on the state and local indicators, including their locally collected and reported data for the local indicators, that are included in the California School Dashboard authorized in Section 52064.5 in determining whether and how to prioritize the goals, specific actions, and related expenditures included within the local control and accountability plan and annual update to the local control and accountability plan.

(5) The instructions developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) shall specify that school districts, county offices of education, and charter
 schools that have a numerically significant English learner pupil subgroup shall include specific actions in the local control and accountability plan related to, at a minimum, the language acquisition programs, as defined in Section 306, provided to pupils and professional development activities specific to English learners, including long-term English learners.

(6) The instructions developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) shall specify that beginning with local control and accountability plans for the 2024–25 school year, school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools shall include specific actions in the local control and accountability plan to address all instances where a school or pupil group within a local educational agency, or a pupil group within a school, receives the lowest performance level on one or more state indicators on the California School Dashboard. The results of the
 California School Dashboard in the year preceding the adoption of the local control and accountability plan shall determine the instances of low performance that shall apply for the three-year period in which the local control and accountability plan is in effect pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 52060 or subdivision (b) of Section 52066, as applicable.

(7) The instructions developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) shall specify that beginning with local control and accountability plans for the 2024–25 school year, local educational agencies receiving funding pursuant to Section 42238.024 shall include focused goals for each school generating funding pursuant to Section 42238.024. The focused goals shall address both of the following:

(A) All pupil groups that have the lowest performance level on one or more state indicators on the California
 School Dashboard pursuant to Section 52064.5.

(B) Any underlying issues in the credentialing, subject matter preparation, and retention of the school’s educators, if applicable.

(8) The instructions developed by the state board pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) shall specify that school districts, county offices of education, and charter schools shall change actions that have not proven effective over a three-year period. This shall include a description of changes that explain the reasons for lack of progress and how any changes to the action will result in a new or strengthened approach.

(f) (1) Except as provided in subdivision (g), the state board shall adopt the template pursuant to the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340)
 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The state board may adopt emergency regulations for purposes of implementing this section. The adoption of emergency regulations shall be deemed an emergency and necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the state board may adopt or revise the template in accordance with the requirements of the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). When adopting the template pursuant to the requirements of the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act, the state board shall present the template at a regular meeting and may only take action to adopt the template at a subsequent regular meeting. This paragraph shall become inoperative on January 31, 2019.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (f), revisions of the template for the local control and accountability plan and annual update to the local control and accountability plan necessary to implement Assembly Bill 1808 and Assembly Bill 1840 of the 2017–18 Regular Session, legislation passed during the 2019–20 Regular Session, or Assembly Bill 130 of the 2021–22 Regular Session shall not be subject to the requirements of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The state board may make necessary revisions to the template in accordance with the requirements of the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(h) Revisions to a template shall be approved by the state board by January 31 before the fiscal year during which the template is to be
 used by a school district, county superintendent of schools, or charter school.

(i) In developing the template, the state board shall take steps to minimize duplication of effort at the local level to the greatest extent possible. The adoption of a template or evaluation rubric by the state board shall not create a requirement for a governing board of a school district, a county board of education, or a governing body of a charter school to submit a local control and accountability plan to the state board, unless otherwise required by federal law. The Superintendent shall not require a local control and accountability plan to be submitted by a governing board of a school district or the governing body of a charter school to the state board. The state board may adopt a template or evaluation rubric that would authorize a school district or a charter school to submit to the state board only the sections of the local control and accountability
 plan required by federal law.

(j) Notwithstanding any other law, the templates developed by the state board pursuant to this section, as it read on June 30, 2018, shall continue in effect until the state board adopts a new template pursuant to subdivision (b) on or before January 31, 2020, except that the state board may adopt revisions to those templates pursuant to subdivision (g) that are necessary to implement Assembly Bill 1808 of the 2017–18 Regular Session or meet federal requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 48, Sec. 62.   (SB 114)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

52064.1.

(a) (1) On or before July 1, 2019, and each year thereafter, each school district, county office of education, and charter school shall develop a summary document that shall be known as the local control funding formula budget overview for parents.

(2) The local control funding formula budget overview for parents shall be developed in conjunction with, and attached as a cover to, the local control and accountability plan and annual update to the local control and accountability plan adopted by the governing board of a school district pursuant to Section 52062, by a county board of education pursuant to Section 52068, or by a charter school pursuant to
 Section 47606.5. The local control funding formula budget overview for parents, local control and accountability plan, and annual update to the local control and accountability plan shall comprise a single document for purposes of the posting requirements described in Section 52065.

(b) The local control funding formula budget overview for parents shall include all of the following information for the school district, county office of education, or charter school:

(1) The total projected general fund revenue for the ensuing fiscal year and the subtotals for each of the following categories:

(A) (i) Funds apportioned under the local control funding formula pursuant to Section 2574 or 42238.02, as
 applicable.

(ii) Additionally and separately, for county offices of education, funds apportioned pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2574.

(B) Of the funds described in paragraph (1), the funds apportioned on the basis of the number and concentration of unduplicated pupils pursuant to Section 2574 or 42238.02, as applicable.

(C) (i) All other state funds.

(ii) Additionally and separately, for county offices of education, funds apportioned pursuant to Section 2575.5.

(D) All local funds.

(E) All federal funds.

(2) (A) The total projected general fund expenditures for the ensuing fiscal year.

(B) Additionally and separately, for county offices of education, budgeted expenditures of funds apportioned pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2574.

(C) Additionally and separately, for county offices of education, budgeted expenditures of funds apportioned pursuant to Section 2575.5.

(3) (A) The total budgeted expenditures for the ensuing fiscal year on the planned actions and services to meet the goals included in the local control and accountability plan.
